Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 2. Preparation of Public School Funding Budget.

Collateral references. —

68 Am. Jur. 2d Schools, § 99 et seq.

78A C.J.S. Schools and School Districts, § 500 et seq.

Sec. 14.17.500.
Student count estimate.

A district shall prepare and submit to the department by November 5 of each fiscal year, in the manner and on forms prescribed by the department, an estimate of its ADM and other student count data, including per school student count data, for the succeeding fiscal year upon which computations can be made to estimate the amount of state aid for which the district may be eligible under AS

14.17.400

in the succeeding fiscal year. In making its report, the district shall consider its ADM, other student count data, the pattern of growth or decline of the student population in preceding years, and other pertinent information available to the district.

Part-time students shall be included in the student count data in accordance with regulations adopted by the department.

When reporting a district’s ADM, a part-time student who is a correspondence student may not be counted as more than one full-time equivalent student.

History.

(§ 2 ch 83 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 120 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (c) was enacted as AS 14.17.080(b) by § 3, ch. 120, SLA 1998. Renumbered in 1998.

Administrative Code. —

For state aid, see 4 AAC 9, art. 1.

Sec. 14.17.505.
Fund balance in school operating fund.

A district may not accumulate in a fiscal year an unreserved portion of its year-end fund balance in its school operating fund, as defined by department regulations, that is greater than 10 percent of its expenditures for that fiscal year.

The department shall review each district’s annual audit under AS

14.14.050

for the preceding fiscal year to ascertain its year-end operating fund balance. The amount by which the unreserved portion of that balance exceeds the amount permitted in (a) of this section shall be deducted from the state aid that would otherwise be paid to the district in the current fiscal year.

History.

(§ 2 ch 83 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For a temporary provision allowing school districts to accumulate a higher fund balance in the district’s school operating fund, see sec. 10, ch. 2, SLA 2021, in the 2021 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For school operating fund, see 4 AAC 9, art. 2.

Sec. 14.17.510.
Determination of full and true value by Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

To determine the amount of required local contribution under AS

14.17.410(b)(2)

and to aid the department and the legislature in planning, the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, in consultation with the assessor for each district in a city or borough, shall determine the full and true value of the taxable real and personal property in each district in a city or borough. If there is no local assessor or current local assessment for a city or borough school district, then the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall make the determination of full and true value guided by AS

29.45.110

and based on a determination of full and true value made by the state assessor at least every two years using the best information available, including on-site inspections made by the state assessor in each of those districts at least once every four years. For purposes of this subsection, the full and true value of taxable real and personal property in any area detached shall be excluded from the determination of the full and true value of the municipality from which the property was detached for the two years immediately preceding the effective date of the detachment. Also, in making the determination for a municipality that is a school district, or for a city that is within a borough school district, the assessed value of property taxable under AS 43.56 shall be excluded if a tax is not levied under AS

29.45.080

by the municipality that is the school district. The determination of full and true value shall be made by October 1 and sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, on or before that date to the president of the school board in each city or borough school district. Duplicate copies shall be sent to the commissioner. The governing body of a city or borough that is a school district may obtain judicial review of the determination. The superior court may modify the determination of the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development only upon a finding of abuse of discretion or upon a finding that there is no substantial evidence to support the determination.

Motor vehicles subject to the motor vehicle registration tax under AS

28.10.431

shall be treated as taxable property under this section.

[Repealed, § 8 ch 19 SLA 2012.]

History.

(§ 2 ch 83 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 95 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 5 SLA 2006; am § 8 ch 19 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was substituted for “Department of Community and Regional Affairs” in (a) of this section in accordance with § 91(a)(2), ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in (a) of this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, repealed (c), which read, “Notwithstanding AS

14.17.410(b)(2)

and the other provisions of this section, if the assessed value in a city or borough school district determined under (a) of this section increases from the base year, only 50 percent of the annual increase in assessed value may be included in determining the assessed value in a city or borough school district under (a) of this section. The limitation on the increase in assessed value in this subsection applies only to a determination of assessed value for purposes of calculating the required contribution of a city or borough school district under AS

14.17.410(b)(2)

and

14.17.490(b)

. In this subsection, the base year is 1999.”

Opinions of attorney general. —

The 50 percent discount allowed in (c) of this section applies to an increase in a district’s assessment on account of the annexation of additional territory.
Therefore, the Department of Community and Economic Development should treat increases in the municipal tax base caused by annexation the same as it treats increases caused by appreciation.
April 25, 2005 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 14.17.520.
Minimum expenditure for instruction.

History.

[Repealed, § 22 ch 54 SLA 2016.]